de: Taktunterteilungen: Achtelnote; Viertelnote; Sechzehntelnote; Triplett; Sonstiges
sl-SI: Poddelitev udarcev: Osminka; Četrtinka; Šestnajstinka; Terceta; Drugo
lt-LT: Dūžių ritminė vertė: Aštuntinė nata; Ketvirtinė nata; Šešioliktinė nata; Triolė; Kita
cs: Další dělení doby: Osminová nota; Čtvrťová nota; Šestnáctinová nota; Triola; Jiné
es: Subdivisiones de ritmo: Corchea; Negra; Semicorchea; Tresillo; Otros
sv: Taktindelning: Åttondelsnot; Fjärdedelsnot; Sextondlsnot; Triplett; Övrigt
nb: Taktunderinndelinger: Åttende tone; Kvart note; Sekstende note; Triplett; Annet
el: Υποδιαιρέσεις του χτύπου: Όγδοο; Τέταρτο; Δέκατο έκτο; Τρίηχο; Άλλο
ja: ビート細分化: 8分音符; 4分音符; 16分音符; 三連符; その他
vi: Chia nhỏ nhịp: Nốt móc đơn; Nốt đen; Nốt móc kép; Bộ ba; Khác
hu: Ritmus alosztályai: Nyolcad hang; Negyed hang; Tizenhatod hang; Hármas; Egyéb
bg-BG: Подразделения на ударите: Осма нота; Четвърт нота; Шестнадесета нота; Триплет; Други
en: Beat subdivisions: Eighth note; Quarter note; Sixteenth note; Triplet; Other
nl: Onderverdelingen beats: Achtste noot; Kwartnoot; Zestiende noot; Triplet; Andere
ru: Ритмическое деление: Восьмая нота; Четвертная нота; Шестнадцатая нота; Триплет; Другое
pt-BR: Subdivisões de batimento: Oitava nota; Semínima; Décima sexta nota; Tripla; Outro
zh-TW: 節拍細分: 八分音符; 四分音符; 十六分音符; 三連音; 其他
ro-RO: Subdiviziuni ritm: Optime; Pătrime; Șaisprezecime; Treime; Altele
tr: Vuruş Alt Bölümleri: Sekizinci nota; Çeyrek nota; On altıncı nota; Üçlü; Diğer
pt-PT: Subdivisões do compasso: Colcheia; Semínima; Semicolcheia; Terceto; Outro
zh-CN: 节拍细分: 八分音符; 四分音符; 十六分音符; 三连音符; 其他
fi: Lyönnin alajaot: Kahdeksasosanuotti; Neljäsosanuotti; Kuudestoistaosanuotti; Kolmois; Muu
pl: Podział bitu: Ósemka; Ćwierćnuta; Szesnastka; Tryplet; Inne
th: การแบ่งจังหวะ: โน้ตตัวเขบ็ตหนึ่งชั้น; โน้ตตัวดำ; โน้ตตัวเขบ็ตสองชั้น; โน้ตสามพยางค์; อื่นๆ
sk-SK: Podkategórie taktov: Osminová nota; Štvrtinová nota; Šestinová nota; Trojitý; Iné
it: Suddivisione delle battute: Ottava nota; Nota da un quarto; Sedicesima nota; Tripletta; Altro
da: Beat-underafdelinger: Ottende tone; Kvart tone; Sekstende tone; Triplet; Andet
fr: Sous-divisions de rythme: Huitième note; Noire; Double croche; Triolet; Autre
ko: 비트 분할: 8분음표; 4분음표; 16분음표; 셋잇단음표; 기타
hr-HR: Dobe takta: Osminka; Četvrtinka; Šesnaestinka; Triola; Ostalo